Hawaii statutes.
[§141-11] Hawaii farm to school
program; farm to school coordinator. (a) There is established within the
department of agriculture a Hawaii farm to school program. The purpose of the
farm to school program shall be to:

(1) Improve student health;

(2) Develop an educated agricultural workforce;

(3) Enrich the local food system through the support
and increase of local food procurement for the State's public schools and other
institutions;

(4) Accelerate garden and farm-based education for
the State's public school students; and

(5) Expand the relationships between public schools
and agricultural communities.

(b) The Hawaii farm to school program shall be
headed by a farm to school coordinator who shall work in collaboration with the
appropriate stakeholders to address the issues of supply, demand, procurement,
and consumption of Hawaii-grown foods in state facilities, primarily education
facilities, and take reasonable steps to incorporate more agriculture and
nutrition education in schools. [L 2015, c 218, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next